Source/desktopeditors/dictionaries/uz_Cyrl_UZ/uz_Cyrl_UZ.aff
SFX J 0 аётганларининг [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларинингми [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларинингдир [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларинингда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларинингдирда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларинингмикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларинингку [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларига [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларигами [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларигадир [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларигада [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларигадирда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларигамикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларигаку [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларидан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганлариданми [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларидандир [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганлариданда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларидандирда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганлариданмикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганлариданку [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларидами [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларидадир [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларидада [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларидадирда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларидамикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларидаку [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларимизни [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларимизними [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларимизнидир [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларимизнида [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларимизнидирда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларимизнимикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларимизнику [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларимизнинг [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларимизнингми [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларимизнингдир [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларимизнингда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларимизнингдирда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларимизнингмикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларимизнингку [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларимизга [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларимизгами [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларимизгадир [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларимизгада [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларимизгадирда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларимизгамикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларимизгаку [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларимиздан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларимизданми [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларимиздандир [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларимизданда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларимиздандирда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларимизданмикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларимизданку [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларимиздами [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларимиздадир [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларимиздада [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларимиздадирда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларимиздамикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларимиздаку [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларингизни [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларингизними [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларингизнидир [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларингизнида [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларингизнидирда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларингизнимикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларингизнику [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларингизнинг [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларингизнингми [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларингизнингдир [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларингизнингда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларингизнингдирда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларингизнингмикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларингизнингку [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларингизга [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларингизгами [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларингизгадир [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларингизгада [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларингизгадирда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларингизгамикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларингизгаку [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларингиздан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларингизданми [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларингиздандир [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларингизданда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларингиздандирда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларингизданмикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларингизданку [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларингиздами [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларингиздадир [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларингиздада [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларингиздадирда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларингиздамикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 аётганларингиздаку [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларнингми [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларнингдир [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларнингда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларнингдирда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларнингмикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларнингку [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимни [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимними [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимнидир [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимнида [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимнидирда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимнимикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимнику [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимнинг [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимнингми [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимнингдир [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимнингда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимнингдирда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимнингмикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимнингку [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимга [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимгами [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимгадир [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимгада [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимгадирда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимгамикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимгаку [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимдан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимданми [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимдандир [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимданда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимдандирда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимданмикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимданку [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимдами [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимдадир [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимдада [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимдадирда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимдамикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимдаку [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларини [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганлариними [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларинидир [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларинида [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларинидирда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларинимикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларинику [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларининг [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларинингми [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларинингдир [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларинингда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларинингдирда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларинингмикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларинингку [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларига [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларигами [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларигадир [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларигада [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларигадирда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларигамикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларигаку [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларидан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганлариданми [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларидандир [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганлариданда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларидандирда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганлариданмикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганлариданку [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларидами [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларидадир [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларидада [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларидадирда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларидамикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларидаку [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимизни [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимизними [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимизнидир [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимизнида [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимизнидирда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимизнимикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимизнику [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимизнинг [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимизнингми [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимизнингдир [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимизнингда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимизнингдирда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимизнингмикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимизнингку [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимизга [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимизгами [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимизгадир [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимизгада [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимизгадирда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимизгамикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимизгаку [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимиздан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимизданми [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимиздандир [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимизданда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимиздандирда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимизданмикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимизданку [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимиздами [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимиздадир [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимиздада [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимиздадирда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимиздамикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларимиздаку [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингизни [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингизними [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингизнидир [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингизнида [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингизнидирда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингизнимикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингизнику [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингизнинг [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингизнингми [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингизнингдир [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингизнингда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингизнингдирда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингизнингмикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингизнингку [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингизга [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингизгами [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингизгадир [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингизгада [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингизгадирда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингизгамикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингизгаку [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингиздан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингизданми [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингиздандир [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингизданда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингиздандирда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингизданмикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингизданку [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингиздами [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингиздадир [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингиздада [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингиздадирда [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингиздамикан [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингиздаку [^аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 ётганларингни [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 ётганларингними [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 ётганларингнидир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 ётганларингнида [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 ётганларингнидирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 ётганларингнимикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 ётганларингнику [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 ётганларингга [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 ётганларинггами [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 ётганларинггадир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 ётганларинггада [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 ётганларинггадирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 ётганларинггамикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 ётганларинггаку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 ётганларингдан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 ётганларингданми [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 ётганларингдандир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 ётганларингданда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 ётганларингдандирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 ётганларингданмикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 ётганларингданку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 ётганларингдами [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 ётганларингдадир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 ётганларингдада [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 ётганларингдадирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 ётганларингдамикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 ётганларингдаку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингни [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингними [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингнидир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингнида [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингнидирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингнимикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингнику [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингга [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларинггами [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларинггадир [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларинггада [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларинггадирда [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларинггамикан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларинггаку [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингдан [аеёиоуўэюя]		
SFX J 0 маётганларингданми [аеёиоуўэюя]		
